Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201264-104
Notary public;
commission; renewal; procedure.

Commissions for
general notaries public may be renewed within thirty days prior to the date
of expiration by filing a renewal application along with the payment of the
fee prescribed in section 33-102 and a new bond with the Secretary of State.
The bond required for a renewal of such commission shall be in the same manner
and form as provided in section 64-102. The renewal application shall be in
the manner and form as prescribed by the Secretary of State. Any
renewal application for such commission made after the date of expiration
of the commission shall be made in the same manner as a new application for
such commission as a general notary public.

Laws 1967, c. 396, § 9, p. 1245;

R.S.1943, (1986), § 64-116;

Laws 1994, LB 1004, § 5;

Laws 2012, LB398, § 3.